Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5556.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
(a) The general assembly finds that:
(1) School psychologists are part of a comprehensive program to meet student needs,
consistent with 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 [the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act"] and 20
U.S.C. Sec. 6301 [the "Every Student Succeeds Act"].
(2) School psychologists are an integral part of the school team and support student
learning, mental health and behavior to help students achieve academically, socially, behaviorally,
and emotionally.
(3) The National Association of School Psychologists recommends a maximum ratio of
five hundred (500) students per school psychologists in order to provide a comprehensive range of
school psychological services.
(4) There is a shortage of school psychologists in Rhode Island, with an estimated ratio of
763:1. Ratios in the urban districts average 1:1000.
(5) A shortage of school psychologists across the State of Rhode Island jeopardizes the
state's ability to provide essential services and supports to students, schools, and communities.
(6) Data indicate that shortages of school psychologists will persist into the future.
(7) There is an insufficient number of credentialed school psychology graduates produced
by the state's higher education institutions to fill existing gaps.
(8) Initiatives designed to promote and support the education and preparation of school

psychologists can help mitigate the problem of a shortage.
(9) Research and best practice show that after three (3) years of employment within a
school, school psychologists become imbedded in their community, resulting in lower turnover
within the profession.
(b) The purpose of this legislation is:
(1) To address the shortage of school psychologists in the State of Rhode Island.
(2) To address the shortage of school psychologists in the higher education pipeline.
(3) To create a pipeline for licensure through the department of health that would allow for
independent contracting, educational evaluations, consultation, and other services related to the
academic learning process.
(4) To improve the academic, behavioral, and social–emotional well-being of children and
youth by increasing access to high quality school-employed mental and behavioral health
professionals.
(5) To improve the academic, behavioral, and social-emotional well-being of children and
youth by increasing community access to high quality mental and behavioral health professionals
who specialize in school psychology, and psychoeducational evaluations.
(6) To ensure the state fulfills its obligations to state and federal laws that address students
with disabilities, school safety, school climate and social and emotional learning.
SECTION 2. Sections 5-44-1, 5-44-12, 5-44-13 and 5-44-15 of the General Laws in
Chapter 5-44 entitled "Psychologists" are hereby amended to read as follows:
5-44-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Academic psychologist” means a person employed by or associated with a recognized
college or university or other recognized institution who is engaged in teaching, studying, or
conducting research in the science of psychology.
(2) “Board” means the board of psychology established by § 5-44-3.
(3) “Department” means the Rhode Island department of health.
(4) “Director” means the director of the Rhode Island department of health.
(5) “Education” means the academic program pursued by a person in obtaining a doctoral
degree, that program to include formal course work, seminars, and practica.
(6) "Graduate program" means a program accredited by the state that is dedicated to
providing an organized program of graduate preparation in school psychology and provides no less
than sixty (60) graduate semester hours (or the equivalent) and includes coursework and experience
relevant to both education and psychology. Coursework shall advance knowledge in:
LC001688 - Page 2 of 23

(i) Data collection and analysis, and data-based decision making;
(ii) Student assessment and evaluation;
(iii) Academic programs and instructional support;
(iv) Multi-tiered systems of support to address students' academic, social--emotional, and
mental and behavioral health needs including:
(A) Universal screening and early identification;
(B) Prevention and intervention services;
(C) Progress monitoring;
(D) Providing a range of increasingly intensive services based on student need;
(v) School-wide practices to promote student learning, resilience and risk factors, and crisis
preparedness, response, and recovery;
(vi) Mental health interventions;
(vii) Consultation and collaboration;
(viii) Family--school--community collaboration;
(ix) Diversity in development and learning;
(x) Program evaluation and research;
(xi) Professional ethics;
(xii) Systems; and
(xiii) All relevant local, state and federal laws, including the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act and the requirements specific to the role of the school psychologist.
(6)(7) “Licensed psychologist” means a person who has been licensed for the practice of
psychology under this chapter. “Psychologist” as used in this chapter means a licensed psychologist
as defined in this section.
(8) "Licensed school psychologist" means a school psychologist who meets the
qualifications set forth in § 5-44-9.1.
(9) "Living wage" means the amount of money needed to provide for annual basic needs
for an individual to live above the poverty level and is determined by the state.
(7)(10) “Practice of psychology” means the rendering of professional psychological
services to individuals, groups, families, or any public or private organization for remuneration.
Professional psychological services means applying established psychological principles, methods,
or procedures for the purpose of preventing or eliminating symptomatic, maladaptive, or undesired
behavior and of enhancing interpersonal relationships, work and life adjustment, personal
effectiveness, and mental health. The practice of psychology includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Diagnoses and treatment of emotional, mental, or behavioral dysfunction, disorder, or
LC001688 - Page 3 of 23

disability, alcoholism and substance-abuse disorders of habit or conduct, as well as of the
psychological aspects of physical illness, accident, injury, or disability;
(ii) Psychological testing and evaluation of intelligence, personality, abilities, interests,
aptitudes, and neuropsychological functioning;
(iii) Psychoeducation evaluation, therapy, remediation, and consultation; and
(iv) Counseling, psychotherapy, psychoanalysis, hypnotherapy, biofeedback, and behavior
analysis and therapy.
(8)(11) “Psychology student,” “psychology trainee,” “psychology intern,” or “psychology
resident” means a student, intern, or other person studying or preparing for the profession of
psychologist under the supervision of recognized educational or training institutions or facilities.
(12) "School psychology internship" means a culminating and immersive field-supervised
experience in which the primary focus is on providing high-quality experiences, attainment of
comprehensive school psychology competencies, and integration and application of the full range
of domains of school psychology. Minimum requirements for an internship shall include:
(i) At least one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours in duration over the course of an
academic year;
(ii) At least six hundred (600) hours of the internship shall occur in a school-based setting
as defined by the National Association of School Psychologists (NASP) standards;
(iii) Opportunities and supervision in a broad range of direct and indirect school
psychological services; and
(iv) Supervision shall be conducted by a credentialed school psychologist or a professional
appropriately credentialed for the internship setting.
(9)(13) “Training” means the pre-professional or professional-supervised experience
received by the person at the pre- or post-doctoral level, that experience to have been obtained in
an internship, clinic, or other similar professional setting.
5-44-12. Application fee.
The applicant applying for licensure as a psychologist or a licensed school psychologist
shall pay a fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 to the department.
5-44-13. Temporary license.
(a) Pursuant to §§ 5-44-6 and 5-44-23(f) and rules and regulations promulgated hereunder,
a temporary permit to practice psychology under supervision may be granted to a candidate for
licensure who has paid the required fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 and has satisfied the following
requirements:
(1) Filed an application for licensure with all required supporting materials;
LC001688 - Page 4 of 23

(2) Has received a doctoral degree in accordance with § 5-44-9, and successfully completed
one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours of supervision satisfactory to the board as specified in the
rules and regulations;
(3) Shall only practice under the appropriate supervision of a licensed psychologist as
delineated in the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder;
(4) Shall refrain from using the title “psychologist” or "licensed school psychologist"
representing himself or herself as a psychologist other than by using the title “psychology student,”
“psychology trainee,” “psychology intern,” "licensed school psychologist trainee," or “psychology
resident”; and
(5) The temporary permit shall be valid for a period of two (2) years from the date of
issuance.
(b) Temporary permit holders may request from the board a one-year extension. Such an
extension may be granted at the discretion of the board upon review of the applicant’s
circumstances. This extension shall only be granted once.
5-44-15. Expiration and renewal of licenses — Continuing education — Lapsed
license.
(a) The license of every person licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall expire
on the first day of July of the next even-numbered year following the issuance of his or her license.
(b) On or before the first day of May of each even-numbered year, the department shall
mail an application for renewal of license to every person to whom a license has been issued or
renewed during the cycle.
(c) Every licensed person who desires to renew his or her license shall file with the
department a renewal application, executed, together with a renewal fee as set forth in § 23-1-54,
on or before the first day of June in each even-numbered year. Upon receipt of a renewal application
and payment of the renewal fee, the accuracy of the application shall be verified and the department
may grant a renewal license effective July 1st and expiring the June 30th in each even-numbered
year.
(d) Every licensed psychologist or licensed school psychologist who desires to continue
licensure as a licensed psychologist or licensed school psychologist shall present satisfactory
evidence to the board and approved by rule or regulation of the board that the licensed psychologist
or licensed school psychologist has completed a prescribed course of continuing licensed
psychological education.
(e) Any person who allows his or her license to lapse, by failing to renew it on or before
June 1st in each even-numbered year, as provided in this section, may be reinstated by the
LC001688 - Page 5 of 23

department on payment of the current renewal fee, plus an additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-54.
Any person using the title “psychologist” or offering services defined as the practice of psychology
under this chapter during the time his or her license has lapsed is subject to the penalties provided
for violation of this chapter.
SECTION 3. Section 23-1-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1 entitled "Department
of Health" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-1-54. Fees payable to the department of health.
Fees payable to the department shall be as follows:
PROFESSION RIGL Section Description of Fee FEE
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(a) Renewal application $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(a) Renewal application:
Manicuring Instructors and manicurists $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(b) Minimum late renewal fee $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(b) Maximum late renewal fee $100.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-11[c] Application fee $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-11[c] Application fee: manicuring
Instructors and manicurists $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-13 Demonstrator’s permit $90.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-15 Shop license: initial $170.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-15 Shop license: renewal $170.00
Veterinarians 5-25-10 Application fee $40.00
Veterinarians 5-25-11 Examination fee $540.00
Veterinarians 5-25-12(a) Renewal fee $580.00
Veterinarians 5-25-12[c] Late renewal fee $120.00
Podiatrists 5-29-7 Application fee $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-11 Renewal fee: minimum $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-11 Renewal fee: maximum $540.00
Podiatrists 5-29-13 Limited registration $65.00
Podiatrists 5-29-14 Limited registration:
Academic faculty $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-14 Application fee:
Renewal minimum $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-14 Application fee:
Renewal maximum $440.00
LC001688 - Page 6 of 23

Chiropractors 5-30-6 Examination fee: $210.00
Chiropractors 5-30-7 Examination exemption fee $210.00
Chiropractors 5-30-8(b) Exam Physiotherapy $210.00
Chiropractors 5-30-8(b) Exam chiro and $210.00
physiotherapy
Chiropractors 5-30-12 Renewal fee $210.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-6(d) Dentist: application fee $965.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-6(d) Dental hygienist:
application fee $65.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-6(d) Reexamination: dentist $965.00
Dentists/dental hygienist 5-31.1-6(d) Reexamination: hygienist $65.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(b) Reinstatement fee dentist $90.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(b) Reinstatement fee hygienist $90.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(c) Inactive status: dentist $220.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(c) Inactive status: hygienist $40.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-22 Limited registration $65.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-23[c] Limited reg: Academic faculty $965.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-23[c] Limited reg:
Academic faculty renewal $500.00
Electrolysis 5-32-3 Application fee $25.00
Electrolysis 5-32-6(b) Renewal fee $25.00
Electrolysis 5-32-7 Reciprocal license fee $25.00
Electrolysis 5-32-17 Teaching license $25.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-12 Funeral establishment license $120.00
Funeral services establishments
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Renewal: funeral/director - $90.00
Funeral services establishments embalmer $30.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-12 Funeral branch ofc license $90.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-13.1 Crematories: application fee $120.00
Funeral services establishments
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Renewal: funeral/director
Funeral Svcs establishments establishment $120.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Additional branch office
Funeral services Establishments licenses $120.00
LC001688 - Page 7 of 23

Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Crematory renewal fee
Funeral svcs establishments $120.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Late renewal fee
Funeral svcs establishments (All license types) $25.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-16(a) Intern registration fee
Funeral Services establishments- $25.00
Nurses 5-34-12 RN Application fee $135.00
Nurses 5-34-16 LPN Application fee $45.00
Nurses 5-34-19 Renewal fee: RN $135.00
Nurses 5-34-19 Renewal fee: LPN $45.00
Nurses 5-34-37 RNP application fee $80.00
Nurses 5-34-37 RNP renewal fee $80.00
Nurses 5-34-37 RNP prescriptive privileges $65.00
Nurses 5-34-40.3 Clin nurse spec application $80.00
Nurses 5-34-40.3 Clin nurse spec renewal $80.00
Nurses 5-34-40.3 Clin nurse spec Rx privilege $65.00
Nurse anesthetists 5-34.2-4(a) CRNA application fee $80.00
Nurse anesthetists 5-34.2-4(b) CRNA renewal fee $80.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-4 Application fee $280.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-7 Renewal fee $280.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-7 Late fee $90.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-7 Reactivation of license fee $65.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-19(b) Violations of section $650.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-20 Violations of chapter $260.00
Opticians 5-35.2-3 Application fee $30.00
Physicians 5-37-2 Application fee $1,090.00
Physicians 5-37-2 Re-examination fee $1,090.00
Physicians 5-37-10(b) Late renewal fee $170.00
Physicians 5-37-16 Limited registration fee $65.00
Physicians 5-37-16.1 Ltd reg: academic faculty $600.00
Physicians 5-37-16.1 Ltd reg: academic
Faculty renewal $170.00
Acupuncture 5-37.2-10 Application fee $310.00
Acupuncture 5-37.2-13(4) Acupuncture assistant $310.00
LC001688 - Page 8 of 23

Licensure fee $170.00
Social workers 5-39.1-9 Application fee $70.00
Social workers 5-39.1-9 Renewal fee $70.00
Physical therapists 5-40-8 Application fee $155.00
Physical therapists 5-40-8.1 Application: physical $50.00
therapy assistants
Physical therapists 5-40-10(a) Renewal fee:
Physical therapists $155.00
Physical therapists 5-40-10(a) Renewal fee: Physical
therapy assistants $50.00
Physical therapists 5-40-10[c] Late renewals $50.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-12(2) Renewal fee $140.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-12(5) Late renewal fee $50.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-12(b) Reactivation fee $140.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-13 Application fee $140.00
Psychologists/licensed school 5-44-12 Application fee $230.00
psychologist
Psychologists/licensed school 5-44-13 Temporary permit $120.00
psychologist
Psychologists/licensed school 5-44-15[c] Renewal fee $230.00
psychologist
Psychologists/licensed school 5-44-15(e) Late renewal fee $50.00
psychologist
Nursing home administrators 5-45-10 Renewal fee $160.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-1(14) Speech lang support
personnel: late filing $90.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Application fee: Audiologist $65.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Application fee:
Speech Pathologist $145.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Renewal fee: Audiologist $65.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Renewal fee: Speech $145.00
Pathologist
Speech pathologist/ audiologists 5-48-9(a) Provisional license:
renewal fee $65.00
LC001688 - Page 9 of 23

Speech pathologist/au- 5-48-9(b) Late renewal fee $50.00
diologists
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(d)(1) Reinstatement fee:
audiologist $65.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(d)(1) Reinstatement fee:
audiologist $65.00
speech pathologists $145.00
personnel: late filing $65.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-6(a) License endorsement
Examination fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-8(b) Temporary permit fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-8(d) Temporary permit $35.00
renewal fee
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-11(a)(1) License fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-11(b) License renewal fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-11[c] License renewal late fee $25.00
Physician assistants 5-54-9(4) Application fee $110.00
Physician assistants 5-54-11(b) Renewal fee $110.00
Orthotics/prosthetic practice 5-59.1-5 Application fee $120.00
Orthotics/prosthetic practice 5-59.1-12 Renewal fee $120.00
Athletic trainers 5-60-11 Application fee $60.00
Athletic trainers 5-60-11 Renewal fee $60.00
Athletic trainers 5-60-11 Late renewal fee $25.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Application fee: Marriage/
Marriage and family Family therapist $130.00
therapists
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Application fee: Mental
Marriage and family therapists Health counselors $70.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Reexamination fee:
Marriage and family therapists Marriage/family therapist $130.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Reexamination fee:
Marriage and family therapists Mental health counselors $70.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-17(a) Renewal fee: Marriage/
Marriage and Family therapists Family therapist $130.00
LC001688 - Page 10 of 23

Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-17(a) Renewal fee:
Marriage and Family therapist Mental health counselor $50.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-17(b) Late renewal fee:
Marriage and Family therapist Marriage and family $90.00
therapist
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-6(b) Application fee $75.00
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-7 Graduate status:
Application fee: $75.00
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-8 Renewal fee $75.00
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-8 Reinstatement fee $75.00
Radiologic technologists 5-68.1-10 Application fee maximum $190.00
Licensed chemical de- 5-69-9 Application fee $75.00
pendency professionals
Licensed chemical de- 5-69-9 Renewal fee $75.00
pendency professionals
Licensed chemical 5-69-9 Application fee $75.00
Licensed chemical 5-69-9 Application fee $75.00
dependency clinical supervisor
Licensed chemical 5-69-9 Renewal fee $75.00
dependency clinical supervisor
Deaf interpreters 5-71-8(a)(3) License fee maximum $25.00
Deaf interpreters 5-71-8(a)(3) License renewal fee $25.00
Milk producers 21-2-7(g)(1) In-state milk processor $160.00
Milk producers 21-2-7(g)(2) Out-of-state milk processor - $160.00
Milk producers 21-2-7(g)(3) Milk distributors $160.00
Frozen desserts 21-9-3(1) In-state wholesale $550.00
Frozen desserts 21-9-3(2) Out-of-state wholesale $160.00
Frozen desserts 21-9-3(3) Retail frozen dess pro- $160.00
cessors
Meats 21-11-4 Wholesale $160.00
Meats 21-11-4 Retail $40.00
Shellfish packing houses 21-14-2 License fee:
Shipper/reshipper $320.00
Shellfish packing houses 21-14-2 License fee:
LC001688 - Page 11 of 23

Shucker packer/repacker $390.00
Non-alcoholic bottled 21-23-2 Bottler permit
beverages, drinks & juices $550.00
Non-alcoholic bottled 21-23-2 Bottle apple cider fee
beverages, drinks and juices $60.00
Farm home food manu- 21-27-6.1(4) Registration fee $65.00
facturers
Cottage Food Manu- 21-27-6.2(4) Registration fee $65.00
facturers
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(1) Food processors wholesale $300.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(2) Food processors retail $120.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Food service establishments
50 seats or less $160.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Food service establishments
more than 50 seats $240.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Mobile food service units $100.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Industrial caterer or
food vending
Machine commissary $280.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Cultural heritage
educational Facility $80.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(4) Vending Machine
Location3 units or less $50.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(4) Vending Machine
Location 4-10 units $100.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(4) Vending Machine
Location = 11 units $120.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(5) Retail Mkt
1-2 cash registers $120.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(5) Retail Market
3-5 cash registers $240.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(5) Retail Market = 6
Cash registers $510.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(6) Retail food peddler $100.00
LC001688 - Page 12 of 23

Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(7) Food warehouses $190.00
Food businesses 21-27-11.2 Certified food safety mgr $50.00
License verification fee 23-1-16.1 All license types $50.00
Tattoo and body piercing 23-1-39 Annual registration
fee: Person $90.00
Tattoo and body piercing 23-1-39 Annual registration fee:
establishment $90.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(1) Certificate of birth, fetal
death, death, marriage, birth,
or Certification that such
record Cannot be found $20.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(1) Each duplicate of
certificate of birth,
fetal death, death, marriage,
birth, or certification that
such record cannot be found $15.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(2) Each additional calendar
year Search, if within 3
months of original
search and if receipt of
original search presented $2.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(3) Expedited service $7.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(4) Adoptions, legitimations,
or Paternity determinations $15.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(5) Authorized corrections,
Alterations, and additions $10.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(6) Filing of delayed record
and Examination of docu-
mentary Proof $20.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(6) Issuance of certified copy
of a delayed record $20.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Autopsy reports $40.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Cremation
certificates and statistics $30.00
LC001688 - Page 13 of 23

Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Testimony in civil suits:
Minimum/day $650.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Testimony in civil suits:
Maximum/day $3,250.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10[c] Annual fee: ambulance
technicians service maximum $540.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10[c] Annual fee: vehicle
technicians license maximum $275.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10[c] Triennial fee: EMT
technicians license maximum $120.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10(c)(2) Exam fee maximum: $120.00
technicians EMT
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10(c)(2) Vehicle inspection
technicians Maximum $190.00
Clinical laboratories 23-16.2-4(a) Clinical laboratory
license
per specialty $650.00
Clinical laboratories 23-16.2-4(a) Laboratory station $650.00
license
Clinical laboratories 23-16.2-4(b) Permit fee $70.00
Health care facilities 23-17-38 Hospital: base fee $16,900.00
annual
Health care facilities 23-17-38 Hospital: annual per $120.00
bed fee
Health care facilities 23-17-38 ESRD: annual fee $3,900.00
Health care facilities 23-17-38 Home nursing-care/
home-
care providers $650.00
Health care facilities 23-17-38 OACF: annual fee $650.00
Assisted living residences/ 23-17.4-15.2(d) License application fee: $220.00
administrators
Assisted living residences/ 23-17.4-15.2(d) License renewal fee: $220.00
administrators
Assisted living residences 23-17.4-31 Annual facility fee: base $330.00
LC001688 - Page 14 of 23

Assisted living residences 23-17.4-31 Annual facility per bed $70.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-3 Application: competency
evaluation training
program maximum $325.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-5 Application fee $35.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-5 Exam fee: skills proficiency $170.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-6 Registration fee $35.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-7 Renewal fee $35.00
Sanitarians 23-19.3-5(a) Registration fee $25.00
Sanitarians 23-19.3-5(b) Registration renewal $25.00
Massage therapy 23-20.8-3(e) Massage therapist appl fee $65.00
Massage therapy 23-20.8-3(e) Massage therapist $65.00
renewal fee
Recreational facilities 23-21-2 Application fee $160.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Application license:
first pool $250.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Additional pool
fee at same location $75.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Seasonal application
license: first pool $150.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Seasonal additional pool
fee at same location $75.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Year-round license
for non-profit $25.00
Swimming pools 23-22-10 Duplicate license $2.00
Swimming pools 23-22-12 Penalty for violations $50.00
Respiratory care practitioners - 23-39-11 Application fee $60.00
Respiratory care practitioners 23-39-11 Renewal fee $60.00
SECTION 4. Chapter 5-44 of the General Laws entitled "Psychologists" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
5-44-9.1. Qualifications for licensed school psychologist.
An applicant for licensure shall submit to the board written evidence satisfying the criteria
set forth herein, on forms furnished by the professional regulation unit of the department of labor
and training, verified under oath, that said applicant:
LC001688 - Page 15 of 23

(1) Is of good moral character;
(2) Has obtained an advanced graduate degree in school psychology from a regionally
accredited college or university whose school psychology program is accredited by the American
Psychological Association and/or the National Association of School Psychologists (NASP) and
requires at least sixty (60) graduate credits with one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours of
supervised school psychology experience;
(3) Has three (3) years or three thousand six hundred (3,600) hours of postgraduate
supervised experience as a school psychologist;
(4) Has passed the Educational Testing Service's School Psychology Examination as
determined by the National School Psychology Certification Board; and
(5) Has obtained credentials as a Nationally Certified School Psychologist by the National
Association of School Psychologists.
5-44-9.2. Scope of practice of a licensed school psychologist.
(a) A licensed school psychologist may engage in the practice of school psychology in
public schools kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12), early childhood and pre-K settings, and
private and charter schools as an employee or consultant to the local education agency or school.
Licensed school psychologists may practice outside of these settings or independent of an
employment or consulting relationship. The practice of educational psychology is the performance
of any of the following professional functions pertaining to academic learning processes or the
education system or both:
(1) Educational evaluation.
(2) Diagnosis of psychological disorders related to academic learning processes.
(3) Administration of diagnostic tests related to academic learning processes including tests
of academic ability, learning patterns, achievement, motivation, and personality factors.
(4) Interpretation of diagnostic tests related to academic learning processes including tests
of academic ability, learning patterns, achievement, motivation, and personality factors.
(5) Providing psychological counseling for individuals, groups, and families.
(6) Consultation with other educators and parents on issues of social development and
behavioral and academic difficulties.
(7) Conducting psychoeducational assessments for the purposes of identifying special
needs.
(8) Developing treatment programs and strategies to address problems of adjustment.
(9) Coordinating intervention strategies for management of individual crises.
(b) The board of psychology shall further define the practice of school psychology in rules
LC001688 - Page 16 of 23

and regulations.
SECTION 5. Chapter 16-11 of the General Laws entitled "Certification of Teachers [See
Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding
thereto the following sections:
16-11-11. School psychologist graduate preparation grant program.
(a) There is hereby established a grant program to incentivize and support the
implementation and operation of school psychologist graduate preparation programs within state-
funded institutions of higher education. This program shall be a culminating and immersive field-
supervised experience in which the primary focus is on providing high-quality experiences,
attainment of comprehensive school psychology competencies, and integration and application of
the full range of domains of school psychology. Minimum requirements for an internship shall
include:
(1) At least one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours in duration over the course of an
academic year;
(2) At least six hundred (600) hours of the internship shall occur in a school-based setting
as defined by national standards;
(3) Opportunities and supervision in a broad range of direct and indirect school
psychological services; and
(4) Supervision shall be conducted by a credentialed school psychologist or a professional
appropriately credentialed for the internship setting.
(b) The department of education shall provide annual funding to institutions of higher
education to fill faculty vacancies in existing graduate programs in school psychology.
(1) For institutions of higher education with existing graduate programs in school
psychology that do not have unfilled vacancies, the department shall provide funding to recruit and
supplement the costs of additional faculty to train and prepare more qualified school psychology
candidates.
(2) The department shall work with institutions of higher education to place school
psychology interns in high needs districts, while ensuring the availability of effective and
appropriate internship supervision, and provide an annual living internship stipend that meets the
state requirements for a living wage.
(3) The department shall forgive the school loans accrued by school psychologists in
pursuit of their degree, upon completion of five (5) years of employment in a high needs district.
16-11-12. Reporting requirements.
(a) The department of education ("department") shall conduct an annual collection of data
LC001688 - Page 17 of 23

on the number of school psychologists who are employed:
(1) Full-time by a school or district;
(2) Part-time by a school or district;
(3) By an outside organization and provides school psychological services as a school
psychologist in a school or district; and
(4) As a full- or part-time contract employee providing services as a school psychologist
in a school or district.
(b) Data shall be:
(1) Used to inform the department regarding high needs districts;
(2) Used to inform the department's decision making regarding the effective use of state
funds to recruit, train, and retain school psychologists;
(3) Used to help identify and target funding needs;
(4) Made publicly available on the state department of education website; and
(5) Reported annually to the general assembly and the governor.
SECTION 6. The title of Chapter 5-63.2 of the General Laws entitled "Mental Health
Counselors and Marriage and Family Therapists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 5-63.2
Mental Health Counselors and Marriage and Family Therapists
CHAPTER 5-63.2
MENTAL HEALTH COUNSELORS, MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPISTS AND
LICENSED SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS
SECTION 7. Sections 5-63.2-2 and 5-63.2-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-63.2 entitled
"Mental Health Counselors and Marriage and Family Therapists" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
5-63.2-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Advertise” means, but is not limited to, the issuing or causing to be distributed any
card, sign, or device to any person; or the causing, permitting, or allowing any sign or marking on
or in any building, radio, or television; or by advertising by any other means designed to secure
public attention.
(2) "Allied field" means counselor education, psychology, marriage and family therapy,
counseling psychology, community mental health, education with a concentration in counseling or
psychology, or other field determined by the board to be an allied field. Said allied field shall
include all components of the core curriculum.
LC001688 - Page 18 of 23

(2)(3) “Board” means the board of mental health counselors and marriage and family
therapists and mental health counselors.
(3)(4) “Clinical mental health counselor” means a person who is licensed pursuant to § 5-
63.2-9, which license is in force and not suspended or revoked as of the particular time in question.
(5) "Clinical instruction" means all supervised course work within which the student has
the opportunity to engage in a broad range of clinical activities similar to those performed by a
licensed counselor/therapist. This instruction includes all practice and internships completed within
a student's program.
(6) "Department" means the Rhode Island department of health.
(7) "Director" means the director of the Rhode Island department of health.
(4)(8) “Internship” means a part of an organized graduate program in counseling therapy
and constitutes a supervised experience within a mental health and/or marriage and family setting.
(9) "Licensed school psychologist" means a person who is duly licensed and which license
is in force and not suspended or revoked as of the particular time in question.
(5)(10) “Marriage and family therapist” means a person who is licensed pursuant to § 5-
63.2-10, which license is in force and not suspended or revoked as of the particular time in question.
(6)(11) “Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, organization, or
body politic.
(7)(12) “Practice of clinical mental health counseling” means the rendering of professional
services to individuals, families, or groups for monetary compensation. These professional services
include:
(i) Applying the principles, methods, and theories of counseling and/or psychotherapeutic
techniques to define goals and develop a treatment plan of action aimed toward the prevention,
treatment, and resolution of social, mental, and emotional dysfunction and intra or interpersonal
disorders in persons diagnosed at intake as non-psychotic and not presenting medical problems;
and.
(ii) Engaging in psychotherapy of a nonmedical nature, utilizing supervision when
appropriate, and making referrals to other psychiatric, psychological, or medical resources when
the person is diagnosed as psychotic or presenting a medical problem.
(iii) Promoting mental health and wellness, which includes the achievement of social,
education and career, and emotional development across the lifespan, as well as preventing and
treating mental disorders and providing crisis intervention.
(iv) Psychotherapy, diagnosis, evaluation, administration of assessments, tests, and
appraisals, referral, and treatment of behavioral, emotional, addiction and mental disorders, and
LC001688 - Page 19 of 23

establishment of counseling treatment plans for individuals, couples, groups, and families with
emotional, mental, addiction, cognitive, academic and physical disorders.
(v) Consultation and program evaluation, program administration within and to schools
and organizations, and training and supervision of interns, trainees, and pre-licensed professional
counselors through accepted and established principles, methods, procedures, and ethics of
counselor supervision.
(vi) The practice of clinical mental health counseling does not include functions or
practices that are not within the professional's training or education.
(8)(13) “Practice of marriage and family therapy” means the rendering of professional
services to individuals, family groups, couples, or organizations for monetary compensation. These
professional services include applying principles, methods, and therapeutic techniques for the
purpose of resolving emotional conflicts; modifying perceptions and behavior; enhancing
communications and understanding among all family members; and the prevention of family and
individual crisis. Individual marriage and family therapists shall also engage in psychotherapy of a
nonmedical and non-psychotic nature with appropriate referrals to psychiatric resources.
(14) "Practice of school psychology" or "licensed school psychologist (LSP)" means the
performance of any of the following professional functions pertaining to academic learning
processes or the education system or both: educational evaluation; diagnosis of psychological
disorders related to academic learning processes; administration of diagnostic tests related to
academic learning processes including tests of academic ability, learning patterns, achievement,
motivation, and personality factors; interpretation of diagnostic tests related to academic learning
processes including tests of academic ability, learning patterns, achievement, motivation, and
personality factors; providing psychological counseling for individuals, groups, and families;
consultation with other educators and parents on issues of social development and behavioral and
academic difficulties; conducting psychoeducational assessments for the purposes of identifying
special needs; developing treatment programs and strategies to address problems of adjustment,
and coordinating intervention strategies for management of individual crises.
(9)(15) “Practicum” means a part of an organized graduate program in counseling therapy
and constitutes a supervised experience within the graduate counseling program.
(10)(16) “Qualified supervision” means the supervision of clinical services in accordance
with standards established by the board under the supervision of an individual who has been
recognized by the board as an approved supervisor.
(11)(17) “Recognized educational institution” means any educational institution that grants
a bachelor’s, master’s, or doctoral degree and is recognized by the board of mental health
LC001688 - Page 20 of 23

counselors and marriage and family therapists or a recognized postgraduate clinical training
program as specified in §§ 5-63.2-9 and 5-63.2-10.
(12)(18) “Use a title or description of” means to hold oneself out to the public as having a
particular status by means of stating on signs, mailboxes, address plates, stationery,
announcements, calling cards, or other instruments of professional identification.
5-63.2-9. Qualifications of licensed clinical mental health counselor associates and
licensed clinical mental health counselors. Qualifications of licensed clinical mental health
counselor associates, licensed clinical mental health counselors and school psychologists.
(a) The department shall issue the appropriate license to applicants who meet the
qualifications in this section.
(1) Prerequisites for licensure of a clinical mental health counselor associate. A license as
a “clinical mental health counselor associate” shall be issued to an applicant who meets the
following qualifications:
(i) Is of good character;
(ii) Has received a graduate degree specializing in counseling/therapy from a college or
university accredited by the New England Association of Schools and Colleges, or an equivalent
regional accrediting agency, and that has the approval by a cognizable national or regional
certifying authority;
(iii) Has completed sixty (60) semester hours or ninety (90) quarter hours within his or her
graduate counseling/therapy program; and
(iv) Has completed a minimum of twelve (12) semester hours or eighteen (18) quarter hours
of supervised practicum and a minimum of one calendar year of supervised internship consisting
of twenty (20) hours per week, or its equivalent, with emphasis in mental health counseling
supervised by the department within the college or university granting the requisite degree or by an
accredited postgraduate clinical training program recognized by the United States Department of
Education, or education and/or experience that is deemed equivalent by the board.
(2) Prerequisites for licensure of a clinical mental health counselor. A license as a “clinical
mental health counselor” shall be issued to an applicant who meets the following qualifications:
(i) Has completed a minimum of two (2) years of relevant postgraduate experience,
including at least two thousand (2,000) hours of direct client contact offering clinical or counseling
or therapy services with emphasis in mental health counseling subsequent to being awarded a
master’s degree, certificate of advanced graduate study, or doctorate;
(ii) Has a minimum of one hundred (100) hours of post-degree supervised case work spread
over a two-year (2) period; provided, that the supervision was provided by a person who, at the
LC001688 - Page 21 of 23

time of rendering the supervision, was recognized by the board as an approved supervisor; and
(iii) Has passed, to the satisfaction of the board, an examination conducted by it to
determine the applicant’s qualification for licensure as a clinical mental health counselor or is
applying for licensure under the provisions of § 5-63.2-15.
(3) A license as a "licensed school psychologist" shall be issued to an applicant who meets
the following qualifications:
(i) Filed an application for licensure with all required supporting materials;
(ii) Has received an advanced level degree in school psychology from a program accredited
by the National Association of School Psychologists (NASP), or equivalent, and successfully
completed one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours of appropriately supervised practice; and
(iii) Shall only practice within the scope of competency, and adherence to the Code of
Ethics, set forth by the National Association of School Psychologists (NASP).
(b) Provisional permit holders may request from the board a one year extension. Such an
extension may be granted at the discretion of the board upon review of the applicant's
circumstances. This extension shall only be granted once.
(b)(c) A candidate shall be held to have qualified for licensure as a clinical mental health
counselor associate, or a clinical mental health counselor upon the affirmative vote of at least four
(4) members of the board, two (2) of whom must be mental health counselors on the board.
SECTION 8. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001688
========
LC001688 - Page 22 of 23